Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 6. Special Funds

§ 4671.
Reserve fund.

The Bank shall establish and maintain a special fund called the “Vermont Municipal Bond Bank Reserve Fund” in which there shall be deposited:

All monies appropriated by the State for the purpose of the Fund;

All proceeds of bonds required to be deposited therein by terms of any contract between the Bank and its bondholders or any resolution of the Bank with respect to the proceeds of bonds; and

Any other monies or funds of the Bank that it determines to deposit therein.

Monies in the Reserve Fund shall be held and applied solely to the payment of the interest on and principal of presently outstanding bonds of the Bank and any bonds issued on a parity therewith and any bonds issued to refund such bonds, all as they become due and payable and for the retirement of bonds. Money may not be withdrawn if it reduces the amount in the Reserve Fund to an amount less than the “required debt service reserve,” as defined in this subsection, except for payment of interest then due and payable on bonds and the principal of bonds then maturing and payable and for the retirement of bonds in accordance with the terms of any contract between the Bank and its bondholders and for which payments other monies of the Bank are not then available. As used in this subsection “required debt service reserve” means, as of any date of computation, the amount or amounts required to be on deposit in the Reserve Fund as provided by resolution of the Bank. Required debt service reserve shall not be required by resolution of the Bank to exceed “maximum debt service.” As used in this subsection “maximum debt service” means, as of any date of computation, the largest amount of money required by the terms of all contracts between the Bank and its bondholders to be raised in any succeeding calendar year for the payment of interest on and maturing principal of outstanding bonds and payments required by the terms of any contracts to sinking funds established for the payment or redemption of bonds, all calculated on the assumption that the bonds will cease to be outstanding after date of the computation by reason of the payment of the bonds at their respective maturities and the payments of the required moneys to sinking funds and the application thereof in accordance with the terms of all contracts to the retirement of bonds.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1971, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Feb. 14, 1972;

1987, No. 55

, § 20, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4672.
Withdrawal or transfer.

Monies in the Reserve Fund or the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund at any time in excess of such fund’s required debt service reserve, whether by reason of investment or otherwise, may, subject to the terms of any contract between the Bank and its bondholders or any resolution of the Bank, be withdrawn at any time by the Bank and transferred to any other fund or account of the Bank.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1987, No. 55

, § 21, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4673.
Investment.

Monies at any time in the Reserve Fund may be invested in the same manner as permitted for investment of funds belonging to the State or held in the Treasury.

For purposes of valuation, investments in the Reserve Fund shall be valued at par if purchased at par or at amortized value, as such term is defined by resolution of the Bank, if purchased at other than par.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1971, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. Feb. 14, 1972.

§ 4674.
Relation to bond sales.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, bonds shall not be issued by the Bank unless there is in the Reserve Fund or Revenue Bond Reserve Fund, as applicable to such bonds, the required debt service reserve for all bonds then issued and outstanding and the bonds to be issued, provided, however, that the Bank may satisfy this requirement by depositing so much of the proceeds of the bonds to be issued, upon their issuance, as is needed to achieve the required debt service reserve.
The Bank may at any time issue its bonds or notes for the purpose of increasing the amount in the Reserve Fund or the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund to the required debt service reserve, or to meet such higher or additional reserve as may be fixed by the Bank with respect to the fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1987, No. 55

, § 22, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4675.
Annual appropriation.

In order to assure the maintenance of the required debt service reserve in each reserve fund established pursuant to this chapter, there shall be appropriated annually and paid to the Bank for deposit in each reserve fund, such sum as shall be certified by the Chair of the Bank to the Governor or to the Governor-Elect, as is necessary to restore such fund to an amount equal to the required debt service reserve. The Chair shall annually, on or before February 1, make and deliver to the Governor or to the Governor-Elect, his or her certificate stating the sum required to restore the fund to the amount aforesaid, and the Governor or Governor-Elect shall, on or before March 1, submit a request for appropriations for the sum so certified, and the sum so certified shall be appropriated and paid to the Bank during the then current State fiscal year.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1987, No. 55

, § 23, eff. May 15, 1987;

2011, No. 40

, § 55b, eff. May 20, 2011.

§ 4676.
General Fund.

The Bank shall establish and maintain a fund called the “General Fund” in which there shall be deposited:

Fees received or charges made by the Bank for use of its services or facilities;

Any monies which the Bank shall transfer thereto from the reserve fund pursuant to section 4672 of this title from the Reserve Fund established pursuant to section 4671 of this title;

Monies received by the Bank as payments of principal of or interest on municipal bonds purchased by the Bank, or received as proceeds of sale of any municipal bonds or investment obligations of the Bank, or received as proceeds of sale of bonds or notes of the Bank, and required under the terms of any resolution of the Bank or contract with the holders of its bonds or notes to be deposited therein;

Any monies required under the terms of any resolution of the bank or contract with the holders of its bonds or notes to be deposited therein; and

Any monies transferred thereto from any other fund or made available for the purpose of the Fund by the State or for the operating expenses of the Bank; provided, however, that no such deposit or transfer shall be required if such action would impair in any way any contracts between the Bank and its bondholders or noteholders.

Any monies in the General Fund may, subject to any contracts between the Bank and its bondholders or noteholders, be transferred to the Reserve Fund established pursuant to section 4671 of this title, or if not so transferred, shall be used for the payment of the principal of or interest on bonds or notes of the Bank presently outstanding and any bonds or notes on a parity therewith, and any bonds or notes issued to refund such bonds or notes, all when they become due and payable, whether at maturity or upon redemption including payment of any premium upon redemption prior to maturity, and any monies in the General Fund may be used for the purchase of municipal bonds and for all other purposes of the Bank including payment of its operating expenses.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1987, No. 55

, § 24, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4677.
Operating expenses.

No amount may be paid out of the General Fund or from any account therein, which account the Bank may establish therein for the purpose of payment of its operating expenses, for operating expenses of the Bank in any year in excess of the amount provided for the operating expenses of the Bank by the annual budget then in effect with respect to that year or any amendment thereof in effect at the time of the payment.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4678.
Special accounts.

The Bank may establish in the General Fund accounts, subaccounts or special accounts that in its opinion are necessary, desirable, or convenient for its purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4679.
Additional accounts.

The Bank may establish additional reserves or other funds or accounts as may be, in its discretion, necessary, desirable, or convenient to further the accomplishment of its purposes or to comply with the provisions of any of its agreements or resolutions.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4680.
Application of funds; excess.

Money or investments in any fund or account of the Bank established or held for any bonds, notes, indebtedness, or liability to be paid, funded, or refunded by issuance of bonds or notes shall, unless the resolution authorizing the bonds or notes provides otherwise, be applied to the payment or retirement of the bonds, notes, indebtedness, or liability, and to no other purpose.
If in any fund or account there are any monies in excess of the amount required for payment, funding, or refunding, the monies may be removed from that fund or account but only to the extent that the monies or investments thereafter remaining in the fund or account are not less than the outstanding bonds, notes, indebtedness, or liability of the Bank to be paid, funded, or refunded and for which that fund or account was established or held.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4681.
Revenue Bond Reserve Fund.

The Bank shall establish and maintain a special fund called the “Vermont Municipal Bond Bank Revenue Bond Reserve Fund” in which there shall be deposited:

all monies appropriated by the State for the purpose of such Fund;

all proceeds of bonds required to be deposited therein by terms of any contract between the Bank and its bondholders or any resolution of the Bank with respect to the proceeds of bonds; and

any other moneys or funds of the Bank which it determines to deposit therein; provided, however, that no such deposit shall be made if such action would impair in any way any contracts between the Bank and its bondholders or noteholders.

Monies in the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund shall be held and applied solely to the payment of the interest on and principal of bonds of the Bank as provided by resolution of the Bank as they become due and payable and for the retirement of bonds. Money may not be withdrawn from the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund if it reduces the amount in the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund to an amount less than the “required debt service reserve,” as defined in this subsection, except for payment of interest then due and payable on bonds and the principal of bonds then maturing and payable and for retirement of bonds in accordance with the terms of any contract between the Bank and its bondholders and for which payments other monies of the Bank are not then available. As used in this subsection “required debt service reserve” means, as of any date of computation, the amount or amounts required to be on deposit in the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund as provided by resolution of the Bank. Required debt service reserve shall not be required by resolution of the Bank to exceed “maximum debt service reserve.” As used in this subsection “maximum debt service reserve” means, as of any date of computation, the largest amount of money required by the terms of all contracts between the Bank and its bondholders to be raised in any succeeding calendar year for the payment of interest on and maturing principal of outstanding bonds and payments required by the terms of any contracts to sinking funds established for the payment or redemption of bonds, all calculated on the assumption that the bonds will cease to be outstanding after date of the computation by reason of the payment of the bonds at their respective maturities and the payments of the required monies to sinking funds and the application thereof in accordance with the terms of all contracts to the retirement of bonds.

Nothing contained in this section shall require the deposit of monies or funds in the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund which are required to be deposited in the Reserve Fund established pursuant to section 4671 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 55

, § 25, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4682.
Investment of Revenue Bond Reserve Fund.

Monies at any time in the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund may be invested in the same manner as permitted for investment of funds belonging to the State or held in the Treasury.

For purposes of valuation, investments in the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund shall be valued at the lowest of the par value, cost to the Bank or market value of such investments. Valuation on any particular date shall include the amount of interest then earned or accrued to that date on any monies or investments in the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 55

, § 26, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4683.
Revenue Fund.

The Bank shall establish and maintain a fund called the “Revenue Fund” in which there shall be deposited:

fees received or charges made by the Bank for use of its services or facilities;

any monies that the Bank shall transfer thereto pursuant to section 4672 of this title from the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund established pursuant to section 4681 of this title;

monies received by the Bank as payments of principal of or interest on municipal bonds or revenue bonds purchased by the Bank, or received as proceeds of sale of any municipal bonds or revenue bonds or investment obligations of the Bank, or received as proceeds of sale of bonds or notes of the Bank, and required under the terms of any resolution of the Bank or contract with the holders of its bonds or notes to be deposited therein;

any monies required under the terms of any resolution of the Bank or contract with the holders of its bonds or notes to be deposited therein; and

any monies transferred thereto from any other fund or made available for the purpose of the Fund by the State or for the operating expenses of the Bank; provided, however, that no such deposit or transfer shall be made if such action would impair in any way any contracts between the Bank and its bondholders or noteholders.

Any monies in the Revenue Fund may, subject to any contracts between the Bank and its bondholders or noteholders, be transferred to the Revenue Bond Reserve Fund, or if not so transferred, shall be used for the payment of the principal of or interest on bonds or notes of the Bank as provided by resolution of the Bank when they become due and payable, whether at maturity or upon redemption including payment of any premium upon redemption prior to maturity, and any monies in the Revenue Fund may be used for the purchase of municipal bonds and revenue bonds and for all other purposes of the Bank including payment of its operating expenses.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 55

, § 27, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4684.
Revenue Fund operating expenses.

No amount may be paid out of the Revenue Fund or from any account therein, which account the Bank may establish therein for the purpose of payment of its operating expenses, for operating expenses of the Bank in any year in excess of the amount provided for the operating expenses of the Bank by the annual budget then in effect with respect to that year or any amendment thereof in effect at the time of the payment.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 55

, § 28, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4685.
Special accounts in Revenue Fund.

The Bank may establish in the Revenue Fund accounts, subaccounts, or special accounts which in its opinion are necessary, desirable, or convenient for its purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 55

, § 29, eff. May 15, 1987.